lexc/noun/enhubokor.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §k§
§VV§  §Jnull§ §oeoez17§ §JJ§
§uue2§ §AE21§ §UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ 
§oooe2§ §oeoez22§ §AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ 
§OEOE17§ §OEOE22§  §EOA17§ §ooez18§

      
LEXICON Root
Noun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;

! acc, sup here, otherwise after nom not there
LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként, önként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam1;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k     Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case1;
                         Case1;
 
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun1oe
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1oe;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1oe;

! acc, sup here, otherwise after nom not there
LEXICON Poss1oe
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként, önként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^öt       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ess:^+cEss^ül          #;    ! ul, ül
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam1oe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam1oe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam1oe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam1oe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam1oe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam1oe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   Fam1oe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   Fam1oe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   Fam1oe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   Fam1oe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1oe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   Fam1oe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Plur1oe
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k     Gen1oe;
        
LEXICON Fam1oe
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1oe;
                       Gen1oe;

LEXICON Gen1oe
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case1oe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case1oe;
                         Case1oe;
 
LEXICON Case1oe
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor


LEXICON AddNounmely
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurmely;

LEXICON Possmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként, önként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t        #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n         #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Plurmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k     Genmely;

LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;
        
LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Casemely;
                         Casemely; 
LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen;

LEXICON Noun
adóterem:adóterm AddNoun1;
almadolog AddNoun;
alumíniumtükör:alumíniumtükr AddNoun1oe;
angyalpiszok:angyalpiszk AddNounmely;
asszonybagoly:asszonybagly AddNoun1;
befogóköröm:befogókörm AddNoun1oe;
betyárnyereg:betyárnyerg AddNoun1;
biccentőizom AddNoun;
biccentőizom:biccentőizm AddNounmely;
bronzököl:bronzökl AddNoun1oe;
bukóverem:bukóverm AddNoun1;
bélsárhalom AddNoun;
bíborszirom:bíborszirm AddNounmely;
büféétterem:büféétterm AddNoun1;
bűzgödör:bűzgödr AddNoun1oe;
cserekölyök:cserekölyk AddNoun1;
cserkészfegyelem AddNoun;
csirkepiszok:csirkepiszk AddNounmely;
csúcsbütyök:csúcsbütyk AddNoun1oe;
csődvédelem:csődvédelm AddNoun1;
deltaizom:deltaizm AddNounmely;
divattörténelem AddNoun;
drágakőkereskedelem:drágakőkereskedelm AddNoun1;
drótvödör:drótvödr AddNoun1oe;
emlősszívizom:emlősszívizm AddNounmely;
energialepel:energialepl AddNoun1;
energiavédelem AddNoun;
esővízgödör:esővízgödr AddNoun1oe;
faszurok:faszurk AddNoun1;
fazekasgödör:fazekasgödr AddNoun1oe;
fejbiccentőizom:fejbiccentőizm AddNounmely;
felsőkarizom AddNoun;
feszítőizom:feszítőizm AddNounmely;
fogyasztóvédelem:fogyasztóvédelm AddNoun1;
fordítótükör:fordítótükr AddNoun1oe;
fékkarom AddNoun;
fényképműterem:fényképműterm AddNoun1;
férfiököl:férfiökl AddNoun1oe;
földpiszok:földpiszk AddNounmely;
fűzőkapocs AddNoun;
gipszgödör:gipszgödr AddNoun1oe;
gondolattitok:gondolattitk AddNounmely;
gramofonterem:gramofonterm AddNoun1;
gyökvédelem AddNoun;
gyűjtőgödör:gyűjtőgödr AddNoun1oe;
gázlóizom:gázlóizm AddNounmely;
halmazburok:halmazburk AddNoun1;
hangszóróselyem AddNoun;
hangyapiszok:hangyapiszk AddNounmely;
higanytükör:higanytükr AddNoun1oe;
homlokizom:homlokizm AddNounmely;
hulladékvödör:hulladékvödr AddNoun1oe;
hágónyereg AddNoun;
hátnyereg:hátnyerg AddNoun1;
hűtővödör:hűtővödr AddNoun1oe;
ibolyaszirom:ibolyaszirm AddNounmely;
információtörténelem AddNoun;
jellemtükör:jellemtükr AddNoun1oe;
jelzőhurok:jelzőhurk AddNoun1;
játéktitok:játéktitk AddNounmely;
kallómalom AddNoun;
karsztvíztükör:karsztvíztükr AddNoun1oe;
katonatitok:katonatitk AddNounmely;
kendertorony:kendertorny AddNoun1;
kilépőkérelem AddNoun;
királytükör:királytükr AddNoun1oe;
kotróvödör:kotróvödr AddNoun1oe;
krizantémszirom:krizantémszirm AddNounmely;
kulcsdolog AddNoun;
kutyabengekéreg:kutyabengekérg AddNoun1;
kézitükör:kézitükr AddNoun1oe;
köldökpiszok:köldökpiszk AddNounmely;
könyökvédelem AddNoun;
kőburok:kőburk AddNoun1;
lakógödör:lakógödr AddNoun1oe;
lelkésztitok:lelkésztitk AddNounmely;
leányszerelem AddNoun;
lábizom:lábizm AddNounmely;
látógödör:látógödr AddNoun1oe;
lóhereszirom:lóhereszirm AddNounmely;
lóterem:lóterm AddNoun1;
lőszerelem AddNoun;
malaccsülök:malaccsülk AddNoun1oe;
marcipánszirom:marcipánszirm AddNounmely;
minitükör:minitükr AddNoun1oe;
molyféreg AddNoun;
mozgóteher:mozgóterh AddNoun1;
májnyirok:májnyirk AddNounmely;
mélyálom AddNoun;
műizom:műizm AddNounmely;
narancskehely:narancskelyh AddNoun1;
negyedvödör:negyedvödr AddNoun1oe;
nyerőterem AddNoun;
növényszirom:növényszirm AddNounmely;
oszloporom AddNoun;
padlóburok:padlóburk AddNoun1;
patikatükör:patikatükr AddNoun1oe;
pertitok:pertitk AddNounmely;
pillértorony AddNoun;
politikatörténelem:politikatörténelm AddNoun1;
pusztamalom AddNoun;
reaktortörténelem:reaktortörténelm AddNoun1;
redőszirom:redőszirm AddNounmely;
relévédelem AddNoun;
rezonátortükör:rezonátortükr AddNoun1oe;
rúnatorony AddNoun;
sarokvédelem:sarokvédelm AddNoun1;
szabványkérelem AddNoun;
szabóizom:szabóizm AddNounmely;
szargödör:szargödr AddNoun1oe;
szemináriumterem:szemináriumterm AddNoun1;
szájtükör:szájtükr AddNoun1oe;
szénpiszok:szénpiszk AddNounmely;
szívgyötrelem AddNoun;
szívizomvédelem:szívizomvédelm AddNoun1;
takarócsücsök:takarócsücsk AddNoun1oe;
tehéntrágyahalom:tehéntrágyahalm AddNoun1;
telefontitok:telefontitk AddNounmely;
testtörténelem AddNoun;
tulajdonvédelem:tulajdonvédelm AddNoun1;
támlatükör:támlatükr AddNoun1oe;
törzsizom:törzsizm AddNounmely;
túláramvédelem AddNoun;
ufótitok:ufótitk AddNoun1;
vasököl:vasökl AddNoun1oe;
világtörténelem:világtörténelm AddNoun1;
vizsgatitok:vizsgatitk AddNounmely;
vákuumterem AddNoun;
webtükör:webtükr AddNoun1oe;
zenészberek:zenészberk AddNoun1;
élettitok:élettitk AddNounmely;
énekterem AddNoun;
észlelőterem:észlelőterm AddNoun1;
ügyvédkölök:ügyvédkölk AddNoun1oe;
